Washington statutes.
RCW 36.60.140

Annexation by boundary modification—Assumption of outstanding indebtedness.

All property annexed to a county rail district by a boundary modification under RCW 36.60.110 through 36.60.130 shall assume all or any portion of the outstanding indebtedness of the county rail district existing at the date of modification.

[ 1986 c 26 s 5.]